Utah statutes.
53A-1a-705.   Eligible private schools.
(1)  To be eligible to enroll a scholarship student, a private school shall:
(a)  have a physical location in Utah where the scholarship students attend
classes and have direct contact with the school's teachers;
(b) (i) (A)  obtain an audit and report from a licensed independent certified
public accountant that conforms with the following requirements:
(I)  the audit shall be performed in accordance with generally accepted
auditing standards;
(II)  the financial statements shall be presented in accordance with generally
accepted accounting principles; and
(III)  the audited financial statements shall be as of a period within the
last 12 months; or
(B)  contract with a licensed independent certified public accountant to
perform an agreed upon procedure as follows:
(I)  the agreed upon procedure shall be to determine that the private school
has adequate working capital to maintain operations for the first full year;
and
(II)  working capital shall be calculated by subtracting current liabilities
from current assets; and
(ii)  submit the audit report or report of the agreed upon procedure to the
board when the private school applies to accept scholarship students;
(c)  comply with the antidiscrimination provisions of 42 U.S.C. Sec. 2000d;
(d)  meet state and local health and safety laws and codes;
(e)  disclose to the parent of each prospective student, before the student is
enrolled, the special education services that will be provided to the student,
including the cost of those services;
(f) (i)  administer an annual assessment of each scholarship student's
academic progress;
(ii)  report the results of the assessment to the student's parent; and
(iii)  make the results available to the assessment team evaluating the
student pursuant to Subsection 53A-1a-704(6);
(g)  employ or contract with teachers who:
(i)  hold baccalaureate or higher degrees;
(ii)  have at least three years of teaching experience in public or private
schools; or
(iii)  have the necessary special skills, knowledge, or expertise that
qualifies them to provide instruction:
(A)  in the subjects taught; and
(B)  to the special needs students taught; and
(h)  provide to parents the relevant credentials of the teachers who will be
teaching their students.
(2)  A private school is not eligible to enroll scholarship students if:
(a)  the audit report submitted under Subsection (1)(b) contains a going
concern explanatory paragraph; or
(b)  the report of the agreed upon procedure submitted under Subsection (1)(b)
shows that the private school does not have adequate working capital to
maintain operations for the first full year, as determined under Subsection
(1)(b).
(3)  A home school is not eligible to enroll scholarship students.
(4)  Residential treatment facilities licensed by the state are not eligible
to enroll scholarship students.
(5)  A private school intending to enroll scholarship students shall submit an
application to the board by May 1 of the school year preceding the school year
in which it intends to enroll scholarship students.
(6)  The board shall:
(a)  approve a private school's application to enroll scholarship students, if
the private school meets the eligibility requirements of this section; and
(b)  make available to the public a list of the eligible private schools.
(7)  An approved eligible private school that changes ownership shall submit a
new application to the board and demonstrate that it continues to meet the
eligibility requirements of this section.
